Hawaii statutes.
[§514B-8] Severability. If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any
person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without
the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this
chapter are severable. [L 2004, c 164, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next